src/nouns_feminine.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Nom +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Noun;

Lexicon Noun
Feminine;

LEXICON Feminine

gata		FemNomInf;
noia		FemNomInf;
dona		FemNomInf;
filla		FemNomInf;
capitana	FemNomInf;
padrina		FemNomInf;
estació		FemNomInf;
missió		FemNomInf;
vocal		FemNomInf;
cantant		FemNomInf;
mare		FemNomInf;


LEXICON FemNomInf
+Nom+Fem+Sg:0	#;
+Nom+Fem+Pl:^s	#;
